Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB746.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301(a) and (d) of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 301. Organization of commission.(a) Composition.--(1) The Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission is continued as an independent administrative commission and shall consist of ten competent citizens of this Commonwealth who shall be appointed by the Governor [by and with the advice and consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate.] for each district as provided under paragraph (2) . (2) Members of the commission shall meet the 1234567891011121314151617181920 qualifications under subsection (b) and shall be selected for appointment under paragraph (1) as follows:(i) The two at-large members shall be appointed by the Governor.(ii) Except as provided under subparagraph (i), the members shall be selected for appointment as follows:(A) For each member position that is or will be open in a district, each sportsmen's group may nominate one individual for commission membership within 30 days of the provision of notification under paragraph (3)(i).(B) For each member position that is or will be open in a district, each sportsman may, within 30 days of the provision of notification under paragraph (3)(iii), cast a vote for one individual for the district from the individuals under clause (A). Each sportsman may vote for one candidate only for each member position that is or will be open in the district.(C) The following shall apply:(I) The names of the candidates receiving the three highest vote totals under clause (B) from each district shall be submitted by the department, within 10 days of the conclusion of voting under clause (B), to the Governor for a member seat that is or will be open.(II) Except a s provided under subclause (III), the Governor shall, within 30 days of the receipt of candidate names under subclause (I), appoint one member from the individuals receiving 20250HB0746PN0772 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the three highest vote totals for each district that has a member seat that is or will be open.(III) The Governor may, for cause, refuse to appoint a member from the individuals receiving the three highest vote totals under clause (B). If the Governor refuses to appoint a member as provided under this subclause, the Governor shall, within 30 days of receipt of candidate names under subclause (I) , notify the department that he or she refuses to appoint a member and the reason for the refusal. The department shall, within 1 0 days of the receipt of the Governor's notice, submit to the Governor the names of the individuals receiving the fourth, fifth and sixth highest vote totals under clause (B) . The Governor shall, within 14 days of the receipt of the names under this subclause, appoint one member from the individuals receiving the fourth, fifth and sixth highest vote totals.(IV) Upon appointment by the Governor the candidate shall be confirmed, and the results of the selection process under clauses (A) and (B) ratified, within five legislative days by a majority vote of the respective members of the committees. A majority vote in opposition to the appointment by either chamber shall result in the Governor choosing from the remaining individuals with the highest vote totals under clauses (B) and (C) within 14 days of receipt of their names. A majority vote in opposition to the selection 20250HB0746PN0772 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 process by either chamber shall reinitiate the provision of notification under paragraph (3)(i). Failure to hold a vote to confirm the appointment or ratify the selection process by either of the committees within five legislative days shall be deemed to be confirmation of the commissioner's appointment and ratification of the selection process.(V) Following two consecutive votes in opposition by either of the committees for a commissioner appointment of a district, the Governor shall appoint a nominee within the top six vote recipients under clauses (B) and (C), within 14 days or receipt of the vote in opposition, who has not been denied confirmation by the legislature. The third and final nominee shall be confirmed without legislative approval.(D) If an individual is not nominated under this subparagraph, the member for the district shall be appointed by the Governor.(3) The department shall:(i) Provide notification to e ach sportsmen's group in each district, from the sportsmen's groups listed within the compilation prepared under subparagraph (v), that the sportsmen's group may nominate one individual for commission membership for the district and the procedure for making nominations. Notification shall be provided as follows:(A) At least 90 days prior to the end of the term of a member for the district.20250HB0746PN0772 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Within 10 days of the death, resignation or removal from office of a member for the district.(C) Via certified mail to the mailing address of the sportsmen's group.(D) Via a notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the district.(ii) Establish a procedure to provide for and collect the nominations under paragraph (2)(ii)(A) and compile the results of the nominations.(iii) Provide notification of the results under subparagraph (ii) to the sportsmen via a notice on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and within a newspaper of general circulation within the district wherein commissions nominations occurred. Notification shall be provided within 10 days of compilation of results under subparagraph (ii). Notification shall include instruction on how and where to cast a vote as established under paragraph (2)(ii).(iv) Establish a procedure using the point-of-sale locations where a sportsman may receive a license to provide for and collect the votes under paragraph (2)(ii)(B) and compile the results of the votes.(v) Compile a list of sportsmen's groups within this Commonwealth. The list shall contain the name of the sportsmen's group and the mailing address of the sportsmen's group and shall separate the sportsmen's groups into the respective district where the sportsmen's groups are located. The list shall be provided annually to the director of the commission and the chair and minority chair of the committees. The list shall be made 20250HB0746PN0772 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publicly available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, and updated quarterly. Sportsmen's groups may petition to be placed on the list via an application available through the department's publicly accessible Internet website or any other manner as determined by the department.* * *(d) Vacancies.--Upon the death, resignation or removal from office of any member, [the Governor shall appoint a competent person] a competent person shall be selected for appointment as provided under subsection (a)(2) to serve for the unexpired term.* * *(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Committees." The Game and Fisheries Committee of the Senate and the Game and Fisheries Committee of the House of Representatives."Department." The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources of the Commonwealth."Newspaper of general circulation." A newspaper, as defined in 45 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions), which is published and circulated in the district where the nominations and voting will be held."Notification." Publication in a newspaper of general circulation and posting on the department's publicly accessible Internet website."Sportsman." A resident angler or boater who:(1) is a citizen of the United States;20250HB0746PN0772 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) is at least 18 years of age;(3) has been issued a resident adult fishing license or voluntary youth fishing license in this Commonwealth for the past three consecutive years; and(4) resides in the district in which voting under subsection (a)(2)(ii)(B) is being conducted."Sportsmen's group." A not-for-profit membership group or organization which is located in the district in which nominations under subsection (a)(2)(ii)(A) are being conducted and whose purpose or mission is to do all of the following:(1) Protect and promote this Commonwealth's outdoor heritage and history.(2) Provide opportunity for and participate in fishing, boating and the conservation of aquatic species and habitat.Section 2. Section 301(a) and (d) of Title 34 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 301. Organization of commission.(a) Composition.--(1) The independent administrative commission known as the Pennsylvania Game Commission shall consist of nine competent citizens of this Commonwealth who shall be well informed on the subject of wildlife conservation and restoration and who shall be appointed by the Governor[, by and with the advice and consent of a majority of the elected members of the Senate.] for each district as provided under paragraph (2) . (2) Members of the commission shall meet the qualifications under subsection (b) and shall be selected for appointment under paragraph (1) as follows: (i) For each member position that is or will be open 20250HB0746PN0772 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in a district, each sportsmen's group may nominate one individual for commission membership within 30 days of the provision of notification under paragraph (3)(i).(ii) For each member position that is or will be open in a district, each sportsman may, within 30 days of the provision of notification under paragraph (3)(iii), cast a vote for one individual for the district from the individuals nominated under subparagraph (i). Each sportsman may vote for one candidate only for each member position that is or will be open in the district.(iii) The following shall apply:(A) The names of the candidates receiving the three highest vote totals under subparagraph (ii) from each district shall be submitted by the department, within 10 days of the conclusion of voting under subparagraph (ii), to the Governor for a member seat that is or will be open.(B) Except a s provided under clause (C), the Governor shall, within 30 days of the receipt of candidate names under clause (A), appoint one member from the individuals receiving the three highest vote totals for each district that has a member seat that is or will be open.(C) The Governor may, for cause, refuse to appoint a member from the individuals receiving the three highest vote totals under subparagraph (ii). If the Governor refuses to appoint a member as provided under this clause, the Governor shall, within 30 days of receipt of candidate names under clause (A) , notify the department that he or she refuses to 20250HB0746PN0772 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appoint a member and the reason for the refusal. The department shall, within 1 0 days of the receipt of the Governor's notice, submit to the Governor the names of the individuals receiving the fourth, fifth and sixth highest vote totals under subparagraph (ii) . The Governor shall, within 14 days of the receipt of the names under this clause, appoint one member from the individuals receiving the fourth, fifth and sixth highest vote totals.(iv) If an individual is not nominated under this paragraph, the member for the district shall be appointed by the Governor.(v) Upon appointment by the Governor the candidate shall be confirmed, and the results of the selection process under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) ratified, within five legislative days by a majority vote of the committees. A majority vote in opposition to the appointment or selection process by either chamber shall result in the Governor choosing from the remaining individuals under clauses (B) and (C) with the highest vote totals within 14 days of receipt of their names. A majority vote in opposition to the selection process by either chamber shall reinitiate the provision of notification under subparagraph (i). Failure to hold a confirmation vote by either of the committees within five legislative days shall be deemed to be confirmation of the commissioner's appointment and ratification of the selection process.(vi) Following two consecutive votes in opposition by the committees for a commissioner appointment of a 20250HB0746PN0772 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 district, the Governor shall appoint a nominee within the top six vote recipients with clauses (B) and (C), within 14 days of receipt of the vote in opposition, who has not been denied confirmation by the legislature. This third and final nominee shall be confirmed without legislative approval.(3) The department shall:(i) Provide notification to e ach sportsmen's group in each district, from the sportsmen's groups listed within the compilation prepared under subparagraph (v), that the sportsmen's group may nominate one individual for commission membership for the district and the procedure for making nominations. Notification shall be provided as follows:(A) At least 90 days prior to the end of the term of a member for the district.(B) Within 10 days of the death, resignation or removal from office of a member for the district.(C) Via certified mail to the mailing address of the sportsmen's group.(D) Via a notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the district.(ii) Establish a procedure to provide for and collect the nominations under paragraph (2)(i) and compile the results of the nominations.(iii) Provide notification of the results under subparagraph (ii) to the sportsmen via a notice on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and within a newspaper of general circulation within the district where commission nominations occurred. 20250HB0746PN0772 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Notification shall be provided within 10 days of the compilation of results under subparagraph (ii). Notification shall include instruction on how and where to cast a vote as established under subparagraph (ii).(iv) Establish a procedure using the point-of-sale locations where a sportsman may receive a license to provide for and collect the votes under paragraph (2)(ii) and compile the results of the votes.(v) Compile a list of sportsmen's groups within this Commonwealth. The list shall contain the name of the sportsmen's group and the mailing address of the sportsmen's group, and shall separate the sportsmen's groups into the respective districts where the sportsmen's groups are located. The list shall be provided annually to the director of the commission and the chair and minority chair of the committees. The list shall be made publicly available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and updated annually. Sportsmen's groups may petition to be placed on the list via an application available through the department's publicly accessible Internet website or any other manner as determined by the department.* * *(d) Vacancies.--Upon the death, resignation or removal from office of any person so appointed, [the Governor shall appoint a competent person to serve for the unexpired term as provided in subsection (a).] a competent person shall be selected for appointment as provided under subsection (a)(2).(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20250HB0746PN0772 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Committees." The Game and Fisheries Committee of the Senate and the Game and Fisheries Committee of the House of Representatives."Department." The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources of the Commonwealth."Newspaper of general circulation." A newspaper, as defined in 45 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions), which is published and circulated in the district where the nominations and voting will be held."Notification." Publication in a newspaper of general circulation and posting on the department's publicly accessible Internet website."Sportsman." A resident hunter or furtaker who:(1) is a citizen of the United States;(2) is at least 18 years of age;(3) has been issued a resident adult hunting license or junior hunting license in this Commonwealth for each of the past three consecutive years; and(4) resides in the district in which voting under subsection (a)(2)(ii) is being conducted."Sportsmen's group." A not-for-profit membership group or organization which is located in the district in which nominations under subsection (a)(2)(i) are being conducted and whose purpose or mission is to do all of the following:(1) Protect and promote this Commonwealth's outdoor heritage and history.(2) Provide opportunity for and participate in hunting, trapping and the conservation of wildlife and wildlife habitat.20250HB0746PN0772 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. The following shall apply:(1) The amendment or addition of 30 Pa.C.S. § 301(a), (d) and (g) shall apply to members of the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission who, beginning on the effective date of this section, are starting a new term or are filling a vacancy due to the death, resignation or removal from office of a member.(2) The amendment or addition of 34 Pa.C.S. § 301(a), (d) and (e) shall apply to members of the Pennsylvania Game Commission who, beginning on the effective date of this section, are starting a new term or are filling a vacancy due to the death, resignation or removal from office of a member.Section 4. The Governor's Advisory Council for Hunting, Fishing and Conservation established by Executive Order No. 2015-13, 4 Pa. Code Ch. 6 Subch. AAA, has no authority to select and appoint commissioners of the Pennsylvania Game Commission or Pennsylvania Fish and Game Commission.Section 5. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following provisions shall take effect immediately:The addition of 30 Pa.C.S. § 301(a)(3)(v).The addition of 34 Pa.C.S. § 301(a)(3)(v).(2) Sections 3 and 4 of this act shall take effect immediately.(3) This section shall take effect immediately.(4) The remainder of this act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0746PN0772 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627